Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 19
Miscellaneous Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2015, No. 559, § 2[3]: Mar. 20, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act places prosecuting attorneys under the jurisdiction of the independent citizens commission established under Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Section 31; that the salaries of prosecuting attorneys are payable from the Constitutional Officers Fund in the same manner as the other officials under the jurisdiction of the independent citizens commission, but only the salaries of prosecuting attorneys are subject to appropriation; and that this act should become effective immediately to provide clarity in the appropriation process for prosecuting attorney salaries. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 16: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of Arkansas adopted Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, at the 2014 General Election, which added Sections 28, 29, and 30 to Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution; that Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, requires the General Assembly to provide by law that Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the commission to enforce Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 and issue guidance to affected public officials; and that the additional provisions of this act provide clarity to the ethics laws of the State of Arkansas and should become effective at the earliest opportunity to prevent confusion and avoid incorrect applications of the state's ethics laws. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 312, § 3: Mar. 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act impact the behavior and conduct of public servants in this state by amending certain ethics laws; that the state's ethics laws ensure consistent and appropriate behavior by public office holders and other public servants; and that the provisions of this act should be implemented at the earliest opportunity to ensure that the conduct of public servants is consistent with the ethics laws of this state and the provisions of this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 9, § 3: July 31, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is intended to avoid difficulties in interpreting, utilizing, and citing Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 30, created by the passage of Acts 2017, Nos. 207, 312, and 1108; that this act enacts certain provisions of those acts in a format that integrates and incorporates them by restating certain provisions of the three (3) acts in a coherent, cohesive, and comprehensive manner; and that to avoid confusion in the law, this act should be effective on the same date as Acts 2017, Nos. 207 and 1108. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 31, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 661, § 4: Apr. 2, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act establishes certain employment restrictions on former members of the General Assembly that are in the best interests of the state; and that these restrictions should become effective at the earliest opportunity to provide for the full implementation of the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 694, § 8: Apr. 4, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under current law the Arkansas Code Revision Commission does not have the authority to correct conflicts occurring when multiple acts amend the same provision of the Arkansas Constitution as expressly permitted by the Arkansas Constitution; that this inability to resolve conflicts makes the law unclear and impossible to publish for review and study by the citizens of the state; and that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity so that it may be applied to acts enacted by the Ninety-Second General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

§ 1. Atheists disqualified from holding office or testifying as witness.

No person who denies the being of a God shall hold any office in the civil departments of this State, nor be competent to testify as a witness in any Court.

Cross References.

Religious liberty, Ark. Const., Art. 2, §§ 24-26.

§ 2. Dueling.

No person who may hereafter fight a duel, assist in the same as second, or send, accept, or knowingly carry a challenge therefor, shall hold any office in the State, for a period of ten years; and may be otherwise punished as the law may prescribe.

Cross References.

Dueling or fighting, §
12-64-836.

§ 3. Elected or appointed officers — Qualifications of an elector required.

No persons shall be elected to, or appointed to fill a vacancy in, any office who does not possess the qualifications of an elector.

§ 4. Residence of officers.

All civil officers for the State at large shall reside within the State, and all district, county and township officers within their respective districts, counties and townships, and shall keep their offices at such places therein as are now, or may hereafter be required by law.

§ 5. Officers — Holding over.

All officers shall continue in office after the expiration of their official terms, until their successors are elected and qualified.

§ 6. Dual office holding prohibited.

No person shall hold or perform the duties of more than one office in the same department of the government at the same time, except as expressly directed or permitted by this Constitution.

Cross References.

Right of certain officers to hold executive or judicial office, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 26.

§ 7. Residence — Temporary absence not to forfeit.

Absence on business of the State, or of the United States, or on a visit, or on necessary private business, shall not cause a forfeiture of residence once obtained.

§ 8. Deduction from salaries.

It shall be the duty of the General Assembly to regulate, by law in what cases, and what, deductions from the salaries of public officers shall be made for neglect of duty in their official capacity.

§ 9. Permanent state offices — Creation restricted.

The General Assembly shall have no power to create any permanent State Office, not expressly provided for by this Constitution.

§ 10. Election returns — State officers.

Returns for all elections, for officers who are to be commissioned by the Governor, and for members of the General Assembly, except as otherwise provided by this Constitution, shall be made to the Secretary of State.

§ 11. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which repealed this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before repeal, this section read:

“§ 11. Salaries of state officers — Increase or decrease during term prohibited — Fees.

“The Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Attorney-General, Judges of the Supreme Court, Judges of the Circuit Court, Commissioner of State Lands, and Prosecuting Attorneys, shall each receive a salary to be established by law, which shall not be increased or diminished during their respective terms, nor shall any of them, except the Prosecuting Attorneys, after the adoption of this Constitution, receive to his own use any fees, costs, perquisites of office, or other compensation; and all fees that may hereafter by payable by law, for any service performed by any officer mentioned in this section, except Prosecuting Attorneys, shall be paid in advance into the State Treasury; Provided, That the salaries of the respective officers herein mentioned shall never exceed per annum:

“For Governor, the sum of $4,000

“For Secretary of State, the sum of $2,500

“For Treasurer of State, the sum of $3,000

“For Auditor of State, the sum of $3,000

“For Attorney-General, the sum of $2,500

“For Commissioner of State Lands, the sum of $2,500

“For the Judges of the Supreme Court, each, the sum of $4,000

“For Judges of the Circuit Courts, and Chancellors, each, the sum of $3,000

“For Prosecuting Attorneys, the sum of $400

“And provided further, That the General Assembly shall provide for no increase of salaries of its members which shall take effect before the meeting of the next General Assembly.”

§ 12. Receipts and expenditures to be published.

An accurate and detailed statement of the receipts and expenditures of the public money, the several amounts paid, to whom and on what account, shall, from time to time, be published as may be prescribed by law.

§ 13. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 89, § 14 repealed this section effective January 1, 2011. Amendment 89 was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2009 Regular Session and adopted at the 2010 general election by a vote of 448,711 for and 250,167 against.

Before repeal, this section read:

“§ 13. Maximum lawful rates of interest.

“(a)

General Loans:

“(i)

The maximum lawful rate of interest on any contract entered into after the effective date hereof shall not exceed five percent (5%) per annum above the Federal Reserve Discount Rate at the time of the contract.

“(ii)

All such contracts having a rate of interest in excess of the maximum lawful rate shall be void as to the unpaid interest. A person who has paid interest in excess of the maximum lawful rate may recover, within the time provided by law, twice the amount of interest paid. It is unlawful for any person to knowingly charge a rate of interest in excess of the maximum lawful rate in effect at the time of the contract, and any person who does so shall be subject to such punishment as may be provided by law.

“(b)

Consumer Loans and Credit Sales: All contracts for consumer loans and credit sales having a greater rate of interest than seventeen percent (17%) per annum shall be void as to principal and interest and the General Assembly shall prohibit the same by law.

“(c)

Definitions: As used herein, the term:

“(i)

‘consumer loans and credit sales’ means credit extended to a natural person in which the money, property, or service which is the subject of the transaction is primarily for personal, family or household purposes.

“(ii)

‘Federal Reserve Discount Rate’ means the Federal Reserve discount Rate on ninety-day commercial paper in effect in the Federal Reserve Bank in the Federal Reserve District in which Arkansas is located.

“(d)

Miscellaneous:

“(i)

The rate of interest for contracts in which no rate of interest is agreed upon shall be six percent (6%) per annum.

“(ii)

The provisions hereof are not intended and shall not be deemed to supersede or otherwise invalidate any provisions of federal law applicable to loans or interest rates including loans secured by residential real property.

“(iii)

The provisions hereof revoke all provisions of State law which establish the maximum rate of interest chargeable in the State or which are otherwise inconsistent herewith. [As amended by Const. Amend. 60.]”

Before its amendment by Amendment 60, this section read: “All contracts for a greater rate of interest than ten per centum per annum shall be void as to principal and interest, and the General Assembly shall prohibit the same by law; but when no rate of interest is agreed upon, the rate shall be six per centum per annum.”

§ 14. Lotteries.

The General Assembly may enact laws to establish, operate, and regulate State lotteries.

Lottery proceeds shall be used solely to pay the operating expenses of lotteries, including all prizes, and to fund or provide for scholarships and grants to citizens of this State enrolled in public and private non-profit two-year and four-year colleges and universities located within the State that are certified according to criteria established by the General Assembly. The General Assembly shall establish criteria to determine who is eligible to receive the scholarships and grants pursuant to this Amendment.

Lottery proceeds shall not be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly and are specifically declared to be cash funds held in trust separate and apart from the State treasury to be managed and maintained by the General Assembly or an agency or department of the State as determined by the General Assembly.

Lottery proceeds remaining after payment of operating expenses and prizes shall supplement, not supplant, non-lottery educational resources.

This Amendment does not repeal, supersede, amend or otherwise affect Amendment 84 to the Arkansas Constitution or games of bingo and raffles permitted therein.

Except as herein specifically provided, lotteries and the sale of lottery tickets are prohibited. [As amended by Const. Amend. 87.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 87, which amended this section, effective January 1, 2009, was proposed by an initiated measure and was adopted at the 2008 general election by a vote of 648,122 for and 383,467 against.

Before amendment, this section read:

“§ 14. Lotteries prohibited.

“No lottery shall be authorized by this State, nor shall the sale of lottery tickets be allowed.”

§ 15. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 54, § 2. Section 1 of Amendment 54 concerns contracts for printing, stationery, and supplies purchased by the General Assembly and other departments of government.

§ 16. Contracts for public buildings or bridges.

All contracts for erecting or repairing public buildings or bridges in any county, or for materials therefor; or for providing for the care and keeping of paupers, where there are no alms-houses, shall be given to the lowest responsible bidder, under such regulations as may be provided by law.

§ 17. Digest of laws — Publication.

The laws of this State, civil and criminal, shall be revised, digested, arranged, published and promulgated at such times and in such manner as the General Assembly may direct.

§ 18. Safety of miners and travelers.

The General Assembly, by suitable enactments, shall require such appliances and means to be provided and used as may be necessary to secure, as far as possible, the lives, health and safety of persons employed in mining, and of persons traveling upon railroads, and by other public conveyances, and shall provide for enforcing such enactments by adequate pains and penalties.

§ 19. Deaf and dumb and blind and insane persons.

It shall be the duty of the General Assembly to provide by law for the support of institutions for the education of the deaf and dumb, and of the blind; and also for the treatment of the insane.

§ 20. Oath of office.

Senators and Representatives, and all judicial and executive, State and county officers, and all other officers, both civil and military, before entering on the duties of their respective offices, shall take and subscribe to the following oath of affirmation: “I,
, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of
, upon which I am now about to enter.”

Cross References.

Members of legislature, administration of oaths, § 10-2-105.

§ 21. Sureties on official bonds — Qualifications — Bonding companies.

The sureties upon the official bonds of all State Officers shall be residents of, and have sufficient property within the State, not exempt from sale under execution, attachment or other process of any court, to make good their bonds and the sureties upon the official bonds of all county officers shall reside within the counties where such officers reside, and shall have sufficient property therein, not exempt from such sale, to make good their bonds; provided, however, that any surety, bonding or guaranty company, organized for the purpose of doing a surety, or bonding business, and authorized to do business, in this State, may become surety on the bonds of all State, County and Municipal Officers under such regulations as may be prescribed by law. [As amended by Const. Amend. 4.]

Publisher's Notes.

Minor changes in punctuation were made and the proviso was added by Ark. Const. Amend. 4.

§ 22. Constitutional amendments.

Either branch of the General Assembly, at a regular session thereof, may propose amendments to this Constitution; and if the same be agreed to by a majority of all members elected to each house, such proposed amendments shall be entered on the journals with the yeas and nays, and published in at least one newspaper in each county, where a newspaper is published, for six months immediately preceding the next general election for Senators and Representatives, at which time the same shall be submitted to the electors of the State, for approval or rejection; and if a majority of the electors voting at such election adopt such amendments, the same shall become a part of this Constitution. But no more than three amendments shall be proposed or submitted at the same time. They shall be so submitted as to enable the electors to vote on each amendment separately.

Cross References.

Additional Constitutional amendments authorized, Ark. Const. Amend. 70, § 2.

Initiative, Ark. Const. Amend. 7.

Time for advertisement of constitutional amendment, § 16-3-102.

§ 23. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning maximum officers’ salaries or fees, was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 5.

§ 24. Election contests.

The General Assembly shall provide by law the mode of contesting elections in cases not specifically provided for in this Constitution.

§ 25. Seal of state.

The present seal of the State shall be and remain the seal of the State of Arkansas until otherwise provided by law, and shall be kept and used as provided in this Constitution.

Cross References.

Official seals, § 1-4-108.

§ 26. Officers eligible to executive or judicial office.

Militia officers, and officers of the public schools, and Notaries may be elected to fill any executive or judicial office.

§ 27. Local improvements — Municipal assessments.

Nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as to prohibit the General Assembly from authorizing assessments on real property for local improvements, in towns and cities, under such regulations as may be prescribed by law; to be based upon the consent of a majority in value of the property-holders owning property adjoining the locality to be affected; but such assessments shall be ad valorem and uniform.

§ 28. Contributions.

It is unlawful for a candidate for public office or a person acting on the candidate’s behalf to:

Accept a contribution from other than:

An individual;

A political party that meets the definition of a political party under Arkansas Code § 7-1-101;

A political party that meets the requirements of Arkansas Code § 7-7-205;

A county political party committee;

A legislative caucus committee; or

An approved political action committee; or

Accept a contribution in excess of the maximum amount allowed by law per election from:

An individual;

A political party that meets the definition of a political party under Arkansas Code § 7-1-101;

A political party that meets the requirements of Arkansas Code § 7-7-205;

A county political party committee;

A legislative caucus committee; or

An approved political action committee.

A candidate may accept a contribution or contributions up to the maximum amount allowed by law from a prospective contributor for each election, whether opposed or unopposed.

It is unlawful for an individual, a political party that meets the definition of a political party under Arkansas Code § 7-1-101, a political party that meets the requirements of Arkansas Code § 7-7-205, a county political party committee, a legislative caucus committee, or an approved political action committee to make a contribution to a candidate for public office, or to a person acting on the candidate’s behalf, that in the aggregate exceeds the maximum amount allowed by law.

The following entities may make a contribution or contributions up to the maximum amount allowed by law to a candidate, whether opposed or unopposed, for each election:

An individual;

A political party that meets the definition of a political party under Arkansas Code § 7-1-101;

A political party that meets the requirements of Arkansas Code § 7-7-205;

A county political party committee;

A legislative caucus committee; or

An approved political action committee.

As used in this section:

“Approved political action committee” means any person that:

Receives contributions from one (1) or more persons in order to make contributions to a candidate, ballot question committee, legislative question committee, political party, county political party committee, or other political action committee;

Does not accept any contribution or cumulative contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) from any person in any calendar year; and

Registers pursuant to Arkansas Code § 7-6-215 prior to making contributions.

“Approved political action committee” does not include an organized political party as defined in § 7-1-101, a county political party committee, the candidate’s own campaign committee, an exploratory committee, or a ballot question committee or legislative question committee as defined in § 7-9-402;

“Candidate” means an individual who has knowingly and willingly taken affirmative action, including solicitation of funds, for the purpose of seeking nomination for or election to any public office;

“Contribution” or “contributions” means, whether direct or indirect, advances, deposits, or transfers of funds, contracts, or obligations, whether or not legally enforceable, payments, gifts, subscriptions, assessments, payment for services, dues, advancements, forbearance, loans, or pledges or promises of money or anything of value, whether or not legally enforceable, to a candidate, committee, or holder of elective office made for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of any candidate.

“Contribution” or “contributions” includes the purchase of tickets for events such as dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar fundraising events; the granting of discounts or rebates by television and radio stations and newspapers not extended on an equal basis to all candidates for the same office; and any payments for the services of any person serving as an agent of a candidate or committee by a person other than the candidate or committee or persons whose expenditures the candidates or committee must report under Arkansas law.

“Contribution” or “contributions” further includes any transfer of anything of value received by a committee from another committee.

“Contribution” or “contributions” does not include noncompensated, nonreimbursed, volunteer personal services or travel;

“County political party committee” means a person that:

Is organized at the county level for the purpose of supporting its affiliate party and making contributions;

Is recognized by an organized political party, as defined in Arkansas Code § 7-1-101, as being affiliated with that political party;

Receives contributions from one (1) or more persons in order to make contributions to a candidate, ballot question committee, legislative question committee, political party, political action committee, or other county political party committee;

Does not accept any contribution or cumulative contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) from any person in any calendar year; and

Registers pursuant to Arkansas Code § 7-6-226 prior to making contributions;

“Election” means each election held to nominate or elect a candidate to any public office, including school elections.

For the purposes of this section, a preferential primary, a general primary, a special election, and a general election shall each constitute a separate election;

“Expenditure” or “expenditures” means a purchase, payment, distribution, gift, loan, or advance of money or anything of value, and a contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure, made for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of any candidate;

“Exploratory committee” means a person that receives contributions which are held to be transferred to the campaign of a single candidate in an election.

“Exploratory committee” does not include:

A political party:

That meets the definition of a political party under Arkansas Code § 7-1-101; or

A political party that meets the requirements of Arkansas Code § 7-7-205; or

The candidate’s own campaign committee;

“Legislative caucus committee” means a person that is composed exclusively of members of the General Assembly, that elects or appoints officers and recognizes identified legislators as members of the organization, and that exists for research and other support of policy development and interests that the membership hold in common.

“Legislative caucus committee” includes, but is not limited to, a political party caucus of the General Assembly, the Senate, or the House of Representatives.

An organization whose only nonlegislator members are the Lieutenant Governor or the Governor is a “legislative caucus committee” for the purposes of this section;

“Person” means any individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, syndicate, labor union, business trust, company, corporation, association, committee, or any other organization or group of persons acting in concert.

“Person” includes:

A political party that meets the definition of a political party under Arkansas Code § 7-1-101 or a political party that meets the requirements of Arkansas Code § 7-7-205;

A county political party committee; and

A legislative caucus committee; and

“Public office” means an office created by or under authority of the laws of the State of Arkansas or of a subdivision thereof that is filled by the voters, except a federal office.

A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalty under subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the General Assembly shall provide by law for this section to be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission, including without limitation authorization of the following actions by the Arkansas Ethics Commission:

Promulgating reasonable rules to implement and administer this section as necessary;

Issuing advisory opinions and guidelines on the requirements of this section; and

Investigating complaints of alleged violations of this section and rendering findings and disciplinary action for such complaints.

Except as provided in subdivision (e)(1)(B) of this section, the General Assembly, in the same manner as required for amendment of laws initiated by the people, may amend this section so long as such amendments are germane to this section and consistent with its policy and purposes.

The General Assembly may amend subsection (d) of this section by a majority vote of each house.

If an act of the General Assembly amends this section, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, make the following revisions to the act so long as the revisions do not change the substance or meaning of the act:

Correct the spelling of words;

Change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

Correct manifest typographical and grammatical errors;

Correct manifest errors in references to laws and other documents;

Correct manifest errors in internal reference numbers;

Number, renumber, redesignate, and rearrange this section;

Change internal reference numbers to agree with renumbered sections, subsections, subdivisions, or other provisions of law;

Insert or delete hyphens in words to follow correct grammatical usage;

Change numerals or symbols to words or vice versa and add figures or words if they are merely repetitions of written words or vice versa for purposes of uniformity and style;

Change the form of nouns, pronouns, and verbs for purposes of style and grammar;

Correct punctuation; and

Change gender-specific language to gender-neutral language.

If more than one (1) act amending this section is enacted by the General Assembly during the same session, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, revise this section as necessary so that all of the enactments shall be given effect, including without limitation renumbering, redesignating, and rearranging subsections and subdivisions of this section.

In the event that one (1) or more acts amending this section result in an irreconcilable conflict with one (1) or more other acts amending this section enacted during the same session, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, revise this section so that the conflicting provision of the last enactment prevails.

If the Arkansas Code Revision Commission makes revisions under subdivision (e)(2) of this section, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall file a report with the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Governor that:

Explains the revisions made under subdivision (e)(2) of this section; and

Includes the text of this section as amended by the revisions made under subdivision (e)(2) of this section. [As added by Const. Amend. 94; as amended by Acts 2019, No. 694, § 1.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which added this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Legislative Amendments.

The 2019 amendment redesignated former (e)(1) and (e)(2) as (e)(1)(A) and (e)(1)(B); substituted “(e)(1)(B)” for “(e)(2)” in (e)(1)(A); and added (e)(2) and (e)(3).

§ 29. Registration as a lobbyist by a former member of the General Assembly.

A former member of the General Assembly shall not take the following actions until two (2) years after the expiration of the term of office for which he or she was elected:

Register as a lobbyist under Arkansas Code § 21-8-601 et seq.; or

Enter into employment as the director of an:

Educational cooperative under The Public School Educational Cooperative Act of 1981, § 6-13-901 et seq.; or

Area agency on aging.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, subsection (a) of this section applies to a person elected or reelected to the General Assembly on or after November 6, 2018.

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall apply to a person elected or reelected to the General Assembly on or after November 4, 2014.

A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a Class D felony.

In addition to the penalty under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the General Assembly shall provide by law for this section to be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission, including without limitation authorization of the following actions by the Arkansas Ethics Commission:

Promulgating reasonable rules to implement and administer this section as necessary;

Issuing advisory opinions and guidelines on the requirements of this section; and

Investigating complaints of alleged violations of this section and rendering findings and disciplinary action for such complaints.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(1)(B) of this section, the General Assembly, in the same manner as required for amendment of laws initiated by the people, may amend this section so long as such amendments are germane to this section and consistent with its policy and purposes.

The General Assembly may amend subsection (c) of this section by a majority vote of each house.

If an act of the General Assembly amends this section, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, make the following revisions to the act so long as the revisions do not change the substance or meaning of the act:

Correct the spelling of words;

Change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

Correct manifest typographical and grammatical errors;

Correct manifest errors in references to laws and other documents;

Correct manifest errors in internal reference numbers;

Number, renumber, redesignate, and rearrange this section;

Change internal reference numbers to agree with renumbered sections, subsections, subdivisions, or other provisions of law;

Insert or delete hyphens in words to follow correct grammatical usage;

Change numerals or symbols to words or vice versa and add figures or words if they are merely repetitions of written words or vice versa for purposes of uniformity and style;

Change the form of nouns, pronouns, and verbs for purposes of style and grammar;

Correct punctuation; and

Change gender-specific language to gender-neutral language.

If more than one (1) act amending this section is enacted by the General Assembly during the same session, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, revise this section as necessary so that all of the enactments shall be given effect, including without limitation renumbering, redesignating, and rearranging subsections and subdivisions of this section.

In the event that one (1) or more acts amending this section result in an irreconcilable conflict with one (1) or more other acts amending this section enacted during the same session, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, revise this section so that the conflicting provision of the last enactment prevails.

If the Arkansas Code Revision Commission makes revisions under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall file a report with the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Governor that:

Explains the revisions made under subdivision (d)(2) of this section; and

Includes the text of this section as amended by the revisions made under subdivision (d)(2) of this section. [As added by Const. Amend. 94; as amended by Acts 2019, No. 661, § 1; 2019, No. 694, § 2.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which added this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Legislative Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 661 substituted “take the following actions” for “be eligible to be registered as a lobbyist under Arkansas Code § 21-8-601 et seq.” in the introductory language of (a),
and added (a)(1) and (a)(2); redesignated (b) as (b)(1), in
(b)(1), inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section”, substituted “a person” for “all persons”, and substituted “November 6, 2018” for “November 4, 2014”, and added (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 694 redesignated former (d)(1) and (d)(2) as (d)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(B); substituted “(d)(1)(B)” for “(d)(2)” in (d)(1)(A); and added (d)(2) and (d)(3).